Tennessee, session 114, SB2246.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-1607(c)(1)(A), is amended by
deleting "fifteen (15) days" and substituting "thirty (30) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2246
012663
- 1 -